Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-179.05
Dairy heifer development facility, defined.

Dairy heifer development facility means a facility that specializes in raising and managing dairy heifers until such dairy heifers are ready for breeding or calving.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 6.
July 18, 2026